Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 540, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 540. A. Any person who willfully delays or obstructs
any public officer in the discharge or attempt to discharge any duty
of his or her office, is, upon conviction, guilty of a misdemeanor.
B. Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from
recording the activity of law enforcement in a public area, as long
as the recording activity does not delay or obstruct the law
enforcement agent in his or her duties.
C. Inquiries by a person being stopped, detained, or arrested
by a law enforcement officer or by a bystander who is observing
another person being stopped, detained, or arrested by a law
Req. No. 12141 Page 1

enfo rcement officer, shall not be deemed obstruction of justice,
unless such inquiries by the person or bystander are purposefully
intended to hinder, delay, or obstruct the authority of the law
enforcement officer in discharging his or her duties.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12141 GRS 01/16/25

















Req. No. 12141 Page 2